District of Columbia statutes.
47-313.01

Source of payment for employees detailed within government.

For purposes of determining the amount of funds expended by any entity within the District of Columbia government during fiscal year 1998 and each succeeding fiscal year, any expenditures of the District government attributable to any officer or employee of the District government who provides services which are within the authority and jurisdiction of the entity (including any portion of the compensation paid to the officer or employee attributable to the time spent in providing such services) shall be treated as expenditures made from the entity’s budget, without regard to whether the officer or employee is assigned to the entity or otherwise treated as an officer or employee of the entity.

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2181, Pub. L. 105-100, § 150(b)
1981 Ed., § 47-313.1.